District of Columbia statutes.
42-1901.08

Interpretation of chapter.

In the application or construction of the provisions of this chapter, the courts of the District of Columbia shall give due regard to judicial decisions and rulings in states that have enacted the Uniform Condominium Act or any other condominium statute that contains provisions similar to the provisions of this chapter.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title I, § 108
as added Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-233, § 2(g), 38 DCR 261
Mar. 20, 1992, D.C. Law 9-82, § 2(d), 39 DCR 683
1981 Ed., § 45-1808.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Condominium Act of 1976 Technical and Clarifying Temporary Amendment Act of 1991 (D.C. Law 9-38, August 17, 1991, law notification 38 DCR 5805).